src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Act:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>immie           FINAL1 ; ! = GH verbalsubst, KB nomen actionis
                                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Ger:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>%^DISIMPeminie          FINAL1       ; ! = GH Gerundium
                              +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+PrfPrc:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%>amme                    FINAL1       ; ! = GH Ptz.Pt.
!   GH Ptz.Fut. b'ïssejässaa missing here
     +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^3sUMLa  FINAL1       ;
         +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>i         FINAL1       ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>%^DISIMPi FINAL1       ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Inf:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>edh       FINAL1       ;
                +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+VGen:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>en        FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Act:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                 +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+Ger:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>eminie    FINAL1       ;
              +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+PrfPrc:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>eme       FINAL1       ;
              +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V+Der2+Der/adte+V+ConNeg:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj%»%^adteUMLadt%>0h        FINAL1       ;
                                  +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Inf:%»iejahtj%>edh                             FINAL1       ;
                                 +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+VGen:%»iejahtj%>en                              FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Act:%»iejahtj%>eme      FINAL1 ;
                                  +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+Ger:%»iejahtj%>eminie                          FINAL1       ;
                               +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+PrfPrc:%»iejahtj%>eme                             FINAL1       ;
                               +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V+ConNeg:%»iejahtj%>0h                              FINAL1       ;
                        +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Uml:%»iejahtj%>%^3sUMLa                        FINAL1       ;
                            +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%»iejahtj%>i                               FINAL1       ;
                    +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+Ind+Prt+Sg3+Err/Orth:%»iejahtj%>%^DISIMPi                       FINAL1       ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»%^1UMLahtall SOVVEDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/lg:%»%^1UMLalg LGIDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldihkie+A:%»%^1UMLaldihk ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldahke+N:%»%^1UMLaldahk flagLDAHKE ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»%^1UMLeldh R ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»%^1UMLeldh FINAL1 ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%»%^1UMLeld FINAL1 ; !


LEXICON IJH_ÅEREDH 
  +V+IV+Inf+Use/NG:%>ijh            FINAL1             ;
  ÅEREDH ;
  
  
LEXICON ÅEREDH   !!≈ * **@CODE@** row A - Group I   Hasselbrink: "öörim."- (Thomassen) Qvigstad: "vöörtim" 

                   +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Uml:%>%^1UMLa         V-I-PRS-SG         ; ! class I special
                       +V+IV+Ind+Prs:%>ie              VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
                       +V+IV+Ind+Prt:%>iej             VSUF-ODD-PRT       ;
                       
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Uml+Use/NG:%>%^iUML    VSUF-PRT ; !Umlaut jfr.Hasselbrink og Qvigstad
                         +V+IV+Imprt:%>                VSUF-EVEN-IMP      ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
                           +V+IV+Inf:%>edh             FINAL1             ;
                        +V+IV+ConNeg:%>ieh             FINAL1             ;
                          +V+IV+VGen:%>ien             FINAL1             ;
! +V+IV+Act:%>eme           FINAL1 ;
                           +V+IV+Ger:%>ieminie         FINAL1             ;
                        +V+IV+PrsPrc:%>ije             flagFINAL1             ;
! +V+IV+PrsPrc:%>ijes        FINAL1 ;
                    +V+IV+PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme       FINAL1             ;
! row F trigger for Umlaut Prt
! Derivations
! -----------
                +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»iej  flagIJE_ODD            ;
        +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAg+N+Err/Orth:%»ij  flagIJE_ODD            ;
               +V+IV+Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»iem  flagNomActOdd          ;
                  +V+IV+Der1+Der/les+A:%»%^1UML          LES_LASSE_ie       ;
            +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^1UMLasovv     IV_PASSIVE_L       ;
!                 +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML       IV_PASSIVE_S       ;
              +V+IV+Der3+Der/InchL+V:%»iegået          GÅETEDH            ;
              +V+IV+Der1+Der/st+V:%»iest            DÅAJVOEHTIDH       ;
               +V+IV+Der1+Der/l+V:%»iel             GOLTELIDH          ;
             +V+IV+Der1+Der/htj+V:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj GOLTELIDH          ;
                +V+IV+Der1+Der/ht:%»ieht            DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV    ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/Caus:%»iedeht ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV ; !we have -didh + -ehte
              +V+IV+Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»iejahtj         AHTJE              ;
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»%^1UMLahtall SOVVEDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
! +V+IV+Der1+Der/lg:%»%^1UMLalg LGIDH ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
              +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldihkie+A:%»%^1UMLaldihk ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP           ;
               +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldahke+N:%»%^1UMLaldahk    flagLDAHKE             ;
       +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»%^1UMLeldh      R                  ;
         +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»%^1UMLeldh      flagFINAL1             ;
 +V+IV+Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%»%^1UMLeld       flagFINAL1             ; !
